Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-8509
Records; maintenance.

Any records
pertaining to transactions under the Portable Electronics Insurance Act shall
be kept available and open to inspection by the director or his or her representatives
with notice and during business hours. Records shall be maintained for three
years following the completion of transactions under the act.

Laws 2011, LB535, § 9.